North Carolina, session 2025, HB285.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the Highway Fund to the Department of
Transportation, Division of Aviation, the sum of fifty-two million five hundred thousand dollars
($52,500,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to be allocated to Southeast
Regional Airport Authority to be used according to the following schedule:
Runway 5/23 Extension $28,000,000
Airport Capital Projects $15,000,000
Water & Sewer Capital Projects $9,500,000
SECTION 2. The Division shall submit a quarterly report on the use of funds to the
Joint Legislative Transportation Oversight Committee and the Fiscal Research Division.
SECTION 3. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*H285-v-1*